Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3 World War I Centennial Commission

Effective date. —

This article became effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-1/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013, redesignated former Code Sections 45-13-40 and 45-13-41 as present Code Sections 20-3-41 and 20-3-41.1, respectively.

Former Code Section 45-13-42 was based on Ga. L. 1977, p. 764, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 346, § 1 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 632, § 4, effective July 1, 2002.

Former Code Section 45-13-43 was based on Ga. L. 1977, p. 764, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 979, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 346, § 1 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 632, § 5, effective July 1, 2002

Former Code Sections 45-13-44 and 45-13-45, relating to appointment and term of director of division and the role of the Secretary of State,
were based on Ga. L. 1918, p. 137, §§ 2, 5; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 89-B; Code 1933, §§ 40-803, 40-804; Ga. L. 1957, p. 496, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 623, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 461, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 455, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 532, §§ 13, 14; Ga. L. 2007, p. 83, § 1/SB 210; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 11/SB 388 and were repealed by Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-1/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-1/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013, redesignated former Code Section 45-13-46 as present Code Section 20-3-41.2.

Former Code Sections 45-13-47 through 45-13-50, relating to compilation and distribution of official and statistical state register, pricing, printing of documents, availability to the public, and other matters, were based on Ga. L. 1918, p. 137, §§ 3, 7, 8; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 89-B; Code 1933, §§ 40-806, 40-807, 40-808; Ga. L. 1961, p. 238; Ga. L. 1970, p. 554, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 532, §§ 16, 17 and were repealed by Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-1/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-1/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013, redesignated former Code Section 45-13-51 as present Code Section 20-3-41.3.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Legal authority, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Archives, Digital Archives, Rule 590-6-1-.02.

45-13-40.
Creation; membership; chairperson and vice chairperson; bylaws.

There is created the Georgia World War I Centennial Commission. The commission shall consist of two members appointed by the Governor, two members appointed by the President of the Senate, and two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Each member of the commission shall serve for the existence of the commission. Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled by an appointment by the officer who appointed the member whose seat has become vacant.

The chairperson of the commission and vice chairperson shall be appointed by the commission from among its membership. The commission may establish such bylaws for its operation as it may deem appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2015).

45-13-41.
Administrative assignment of commission to office of Board of Regents of University System of Georgia; support staff and facilities; Attorney General to provide legal counsel.

The commission shall be attached for administrative purposes to the office of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia. If approved by the Board of Regents, the board shall provide support staff and facilities for the commission. The Attorney General shall provide legal counsel to the commission and shall provide legal representation in any matter involving the affairs of the commission. No additional state appropriations shall be made for this commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

45-13-42.
Purpose of commission.

The purpose of the Georgia World War I Centennial Commission shall be:

To plan, develop, and execute programs, projects, and activities to commemorate the centennial of World War I and Georgia’s role in it;

To encourage private organizations and local governments in Georgia to organize and participate in activities commemorating the centennial of World War I; and

To serve as a clearinghouse for the collection and dissemination of information about events and plans, in Georgia, for the centennial of World War I.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

45-13-43.
Authority to hold hearings, take testimony, and receive evidence.

The commission may hold such hearings, sit and act at such times and places, take such testimony, and receive such evidence as the commission considers appropriate to carry out its duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, “this article” was substituted for “this Act” at the end of this Code section.

45-13-44.
Solicitation of information from state departments and agencies.

The commission shall secure directly from any state department or agency such information as the commission considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. Upon the request of the chairperson of the commission, the head of such department or agency shall furnish such information to the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, “this article” was substituted for “this Act” in the first sentence of this Code section.

45-13-45.
Authority to enter into contracts, leases, or other agreements.

The commission may not enter into any contract, lease, or other legal agreement that extends beyond the date of the termination of the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

45-13-46.
Sources of funding.

Gifts, bequests, and devises of services or property, both real and personal, received by the commission provided under this article shall be the only source of funds to cover the costs incurred by the commission under this article. No state funds shall be appropriated for the commission’s operation.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

45-13-47.
Reporting requirements.

Not later than December 31, 2015, and not later than the last day of each three-month period thereafter, the commission shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor a report on the activities and plans of the commission.

Not later than June 30, 2017, the commission shall submit to General Assembly and Governor a report containing specific recommendations for commemorating the centennial of World War I and coordinating related activities.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203.

45-13-48.
Termination.

The commission shall terminate on the date that is 30 days after the date the completion of the activities under this article honoring the centennial observation of World War I or December 31, 2019, whichever date is earlier.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 404, § 1/SB 203; Ga. L. 2019, p. 802, § 1/SB 140.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “December 31, 2019” for “July 28, 2019” near the end of this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, a comma was deleted following “July”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, “this article” was substituted for “this Act” in the middle of this Code section.

45-13-49 through 45-13-50.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-1/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections, relating to compilation and distribution of official and statistical state register, pricing, printing of documents, availability to the public, and other matters, were based on Ga. L. 1918, p. 137, §§ 3, 7, 8; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 89-B; Code 1933, §§ 40-806, 40-807, 40-808; Ga. L. 1961, p. 238; Ga. L. 1970, p. 554, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 532, §§ 16, 17.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45(9)/SB 340, effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, reserved the designation of this article.

45-13-51.
Reserved and redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 1-1/HB 287, effective July 1, 2013, redesignated former Code Section 45-13-51 as present Code Section 20-3-41.3.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45(9)/SB 340, effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, reserved the designation of this article.